Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2810.01
Chemically equivalent, defined.

Chemically equivalent means drug products that contain amounts of the identical therapeutically active ingredients in the identical strength, quantity, and dosage form and that meet present compendial standards.

Laws 2017, LB481, § 6.